hr-HR: Veličina muffina: Zalogaj; Jumbo; Mini; Vrh muffina; Standardno; Ostalo
sk-SK: Veľkosť mafinu: Na jedno sústo; Jumbo; Mini; Vršok muffinu; Štandardná; Iné
tr: Muffin boyut sınıfı: Lokmalık; Jumbo; Mini; Muffin tepesi; Standart; Diğer
ja: マフィンサイズ: 一口サイズ; ジャンボ; ミニ; マフィントップ; スタンダード; その他
zh-TW: 馬芬尺寸: 一口大小; 特大; 迷你; 馬芬頂部; 標準; 其他
it: Taglia Muffin: Bocconcino; Jumbo; Mini; Muffin top; Standard; Altro
pt-BR: Tamanho do muffin: Para petiscar; Jumbo; Mini; Topo de muffin; Padrão; Outros
ru: Размер маффина: На один укус; Джамбо; Мини; Верхушка маффина; Стандартный; Другое
el: Μέγεθος μάφιν: Μέγεθος μπουκιάς; Jumbo; Μίνι; Κορυφή μάφιν; Κανονικό; Άλλο
ro-RO: Dimensiunea brioșei: Mărimea unei înghițituri; Jumbo; Mini; Pălărie de brioșă; Standard; Altele
zh-CN: 消音器尺寸: 一口大小; 特大号; 迷你号; 玛芬顶; 标准号; 其他
lt-LT: Keksiuko dydis: Vieno kąsnio; Labai didelis; Mažas („Mini“); Keksiuko viršus; Standartinis; Kita
ko: 머핀 크기: 한 입 크기; 점보; 미니; 머핀 탑; 스탠더드; 기타
vi: Kích thước bánh muffin: Vừa miệng; Khổng lồ; Mini; Phần trên bánh muffin; Tiêu chuẩn; Khác
da: Muffinstørrelse: Mundret; Jumbo; Mini; Muffintop; Standard; Andet
pt-PT: Muffins: Pequeno; Jumbo; Mini; Topo de muffin; Padrão; Outro
sl-SI: Velikost kolačka: Velikost grižljaja; Jumbo; Mini; Vrh mafina; Standardno; Drugo
en: Muffin size: Bite size; Jumbo; Mini; Muffin top; Standard; Other
hu: Muffin mérete: Falatnyi; Jumbo; Mini; Muffintető; Normál; Egyéb
fi: Muffinin koko: Suupala; Jumbo; Mini; Muffinin yläosa; Vakio; Muu
th: ขนาดมัฟฟิน: ขนาดพอดีคำ; จัมโบ้; มินิ; หน้ามัฟฟิน; มาตรฐาน; อื่นๆ
fr: Taille du muffin: Format bouchée; Géant; Mini; Tête de muffin; Standard; Autre
de: Muffingröße: Mundgerecht; Jumbo; Mini; Muffindeckel; Standard; Sonstige
cs: Velikost muffinu: Na jedno sousto; Jumbo; Mini; Vršek muffinu; Standardní; Jiné
nb: Muffinsstørrelse: Munnfull; Jumbo; Mini; Muffinstopp; Standard; Annet
es: Tamaño de la magdalena: Tamaño de un bocado; Gigante; Mini; Parte superior del muffin; Estándar; Otro
bg-BG: Размер на мъфините: Хапка; Джъмбо; Мини; Шапка на мъфин; Стандартен; Друго
nl: Muffin maat: Bite-size; Jumbo; Mini; Muffintop; Standaard; Overig
pl: Rozmiar muffina: Na jeden kęs; Gigant; Mini; Wierzch muffinki; Standardowe; Inne
sv: Blockspel – tonhöjdstyp: Munsbit; Jumbo; Mini; Muffinstopp; Standard; Övrigt